Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.98.040

Prior investments or transactions not affected.

Nothing in this title shall be construed to affect the legality of investments, made prior to March 10, 1917, or of transactions had before March 10, 1917, pursuant to any provisions of law in force when such investment were made or transactions had. (Adopted from 1917 c 80 § 77.)

[ 1955 c 33 s 30.98.040. Formerly RCW 30.98.040.]